Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-802
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act
are to: (1) Reorganize statutes relating to the provision of publicly funded
behavioral health services; (2) provide for the organization and administration
of the public behavioral health system within the department; (3) rename mental
health regions as behavioral health regions; (4) provide for the naming of
regional behavioral health authorities and ongoing activities of regional
governing boards; (5) reorganize and rename the State Mental Health Planning
and Evaluation Council and the State Alcoholism and
Drug Abuse Advisory Committee; (6) change and add provisions relating
to development of community-based behavioral health services and funding for
behavioral health services; and (7) authorize the closure of regional centers.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 92;

Laws 2013, LB6, § 12.